Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.570

Mass timber products—Building construction.

(1) As used in this section, "mass timber products" means a type of building component or system that uses large panelized wood construction, including:

(a) Cross-laminated timber;

(b) Nail laminated timber;

(c) Glue laminated timber;

(d) Laminated strand timber;

(e) Dowel laminated timber;

(f) Laminated veneer lumber;

(g) Structural composite lumber; and

(h) Wood concrete composites.

(2) The building code council shall adopt rules for the use of mass timber products for residential and commercial building construction. Rules adopted for the use of mass timber products by the state building code council must consider applicable national and international standards.

[ 2018 c 29 s 1.]